Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 HF 848 (2) 91 th/ns/md H.F. 848 Section 1. Section 307A.1A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. There is created a state transportation commission 3 which shall consist of seven nine members, not more than four 4 five of whom shall be from the same political party. The 5 governor shall appoint the members of the state transportation 6 commission for a term of four years beginning at 12:01 a.m. 7 on July 1 in the year of appointment and expiring at 12:00 8 midnight on June 30 in the year of expiration, subject to 9 confirmation by the senate. For each of the seven regions of 10 the state, as designated by paragraph âbâ , the governor shall 11 appoint one member to represent the region, and the member 12 shall reside in the region. In addition, the governor shall 13 appoint two at-large members who shall reside in this state. 14 b. For purposes of this subsection, the state is divided 15 into seven regions, which shall be composed of the following 16 counties: 17 (1) Region 1 consists of Buena Vista, Calhoun, Cherokee, 18 Clay, Dickinson, Emmet, Franklin, Hamilton, Hardin, Humboldt, 19 Ida, Kossuth, Lyon, OâBrien, Osceola, Palo Alto, Plymouth, 20 Pocahontas, Sac, Sioux, Webster, Woodbury, and Wright counties. 21 (2) Region 2 consists of Black Hawk, Bremer, Buchanan, 22 Butler, Cerro Gordo, Chickasaw, Fayette, Floyd, Grundy, 23 Hancock, Howard, Mitchell, Winnebago, Winneshiek, and Worth 24 counties. 25 (3) Region 3 consists of Allamakee, Clayton, Clinton, 26 Delaware, Dubuque, Jackson, and Scott counties. 27 (4) Region 4 consists of Adair, Audubon, Carroll, Cass, 28 Crawford, Fremont, Greene, Guthrie, Harrison, Mills, Monona, 29 Pottawattamie, and Shelby counties. 30 (5) Region 5 consists of Boone, Dallas, Jasper, Madison, 31 Mahaska, Marion, Marshall, Polk, Poweshiek, Story, Tama, and 32 Warren counties. 33 (6) Region 6 consists of Benton, Cedar, Des Moines, 34 Henry, Iowa, Johnson, Jones, Lee, Linn, Louisa, and Muscatine 35 -1- HF 848 (2) 91 th/ns/md 1/ 3 H.F. 848 counties. 1 (7) Region 7 consists of Adams, Appanoose, Clarke, Davis, 2 Decatur, Jefferson, Keokuk, Lucas, Monroe, Montgomery, Page, 3 Ringgold, Taylor, Union, Van Buren, Wapello, Washington, and 4 Wayne counties. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 307A.9 Residency requirement ââ 6 resignation from office. 7 1. A member of the commission appointed to represent 8 a region of the state, as described in section 307A.1A, 9 subsection 1, who no longer resides in the region shall be 10 deemed to have resigned from the commission and the vacancy 11 shall be filled as described in section 307A.4. 12 2. An at-large member of the commission who no longer 13 resides in this state shall be deemed to have resigned from 14 the commission and the vacancy shall be filled as described in 15 section 307A.4. 16 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 17 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY AND TRANSITION. This Act applies to 19 members of the state transportation commission appointed and 20 confirmed on or after the effective date of this Act. 21 1. The first regular term appointment made on or after the 22 effective date of this Act shall be an at-large member. 23 2. The second regular term appointment made on or after the 24 effective date of this Act shall be an at-large member. 25 3. The third regular term appointment made on or after the 26 effective date of this Act shall represent region 1. 27 4. The fourth regular term appointment made on or after the 28 effective date of this Act shall represent region 2. 29 5. The fifth regular term appointment made on or after the 30 effective date of this Act shall represent region 3. 31 6. The sixth regular term appointment made on or after the 32 effective date of this Act shall represent region 4. 33 7. The seventh regular term appointment made on or after the 34 effective date of this Act shall represent region 5. 35 -2- HF 848 (2) 91 th/ns/md 2/ 3 H.F. 848 8. The eighth regular term appointment made on or after the 1 effective date of this Act shall represent region 6. 2 9. The ninth regular term appointment made on or after the 3 effective date of this Act shall represent region 7. 4 -3- HF 848 (2) 91 th/ns/md 3/ 3